Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 11
MIDDLE-INCOME HOUSING AUTHORITY

29-4-1101. Short title.

The short title of this part 11 is the "Middle-income Housing Authority Act".

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-232), ch. 354, p. 2516, § 2, effective June 3.

29-4-1102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

There is an acute shortage of affordable middle-income housing in the state, particularly in fast-growing areas where jobs are being created. Housing is increasingly not affordable for essential workers such as nurses, teachers, firefighters, and other members of communities who earn too much to qualify for governmental housing subsidies and for whom the market is not building new housing.

For most of Colorado's post-war history, the private market provided an abundant supply of starter homes for middle-income earners. As costs have escalated in high-cost housing markets, private investors have shifted their focus to financing housing for only the top earners in the marketplace, where high returns on investment can still be achieved. In the Denver metro area, not only are there fewer affordable rental units built every year, but there are also fewer affordable rental properties in total. This same trend is occurring in all high-cost communities across the state.

There are established markets to raise capital to finance affordable housing for low-income individuals who qualify for governmental housing subsidies, generally those whose income is sixty percent, or in some cases eighty percent, or less of area median income, through the sale of federal and state low-income housing tax credits and tax-exempt bonds;

Even with historic state investment this year of hundreds of millions of dollars for affordable housing, the statewide need is in the billions; even with the general assembly's investment, there simply is not enough capital available to finance the middle-income workforce housing, leaving a damaging void of housing supply for middle-income individuals, families, and communities;

In order to solve for the acute shortage of affordable middle-income housing, a mechanism is needed that will robustly increase the supply of affordable middle-income housing by raising large amounts of private sector capital to finance projects that can be placed into service quickly and efficiently. The creation of the middle-income housing authority is such a mechanism.

The authority will be able to place projects into service quickly and efficiently because it will rely on the expertise of local governments, nonprofit organizations, and experienced real estate industry professionals to identify, propose, develop, and operate its projects;

The authority's housing units will remain affordable with stable rents because they will be owned by the authority and operated by experienced and competent operators at the authority's direction, in perpetuity; and

Increasing affordable rental workforce housing through the activities of the authority and the exercise of its plenary powers pursuant to this part 11 is in the public interest and is a matter of statewide concern. The activities of the authority will comply with fair housing laws and promote a substantial, legitimate, and nondiscriminatory interest of the state that cannot be served by another practice that has a less discriminatory effect.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-232), ch. 354, p. 2516, § 2, effective June 3.

29-4-1103. Definitions.

As used in this part 11, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Affordable rental housing project" means real property that has the primary purpose of providing rental housing for middle-income individuals and families, which property is selected by the authority and owned by the authority in accordance with the provisions set forth in section 29-4-1107.

An "affordable rental housing project" may include commercial space if the board determines that the commercial space is incidental to the housing component of the project.

"Authority" means the middle-income housing authority created by this part 11.

"Board" means the board of directors of the authority.

"Bond" means any bond, note, or other obligation of the authority authorized to be issued under this part 11.

"Controlled entity" means an entity established by the authority in accordance with section 29-4-1106 (1)(g).

"Fair housing laws" means the federal "Fair Housing Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 3601 et seq., as amended, any comparable law of the state, and any comparable ordinance, resolution, or other law of any local government that property of the authority is subject to and the regulations and rules promulgated under this part 11.

"Middle-income individuals and families" means, only for purposes of this part 11, except as modified in exceptional circumstances by the board pursuant to section 29-4-1107 (2)(c), individuals and families with annual income of the household between eighty percent and one hundred twenty percent of the area median income of the households of that size in the county in which the affordable rental housing project is located; except that, for middle-income individuals and families residing in a rural resort county, the annual income of the household shall be between eighty percent and one hundred forty percent of the area median income of the households of that size in the county in which the affordable rental housing project is located.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-232), ch. 354, p. 2518, § 2, effective June 3.

29-4-1104. Middle-income housing authority - creation - board of directors - meetings - records - tax exempt - audit - report.

There is created the middle-income housing authority, which is a body corporate and a political subdivision of the state, which shall not be an agency of state government, and shall not be subject to administrative direction by any department, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state.

The powers of the authority are vested in the governing body of the authority, which is a board of directors.

The board consists of fourteen persons.

The governor shall appoint to the board, with the consent of the senate:

At least one member with experience in one of each of the following areas:

The development of rental housing;

Real estate transactions; and

Public finance; and

At least one member which meets one of the following criteria:

Be the director of a local housing authority;

Be an elected county commissioner from a rural county in the state;

Be an elected county commissioner from a county in the state; and

Be a representative from a nonprofit organization that has experience developing middle-income housing.

In addition to the appointments set forth in subsection (2)(c)(I) of this section, the governor shall appoint to the board:

The director of the office of economic development established in section 24-48.5-101 (1), or the director's designee; and

The director of the division of housing established in section 24-32-704, or the director's designee.

In addition to the requirements of this subsection (2) of this section, when making appointments to the board, reasonable efforts must be made to appoint members that reflect the geographic and demographic diversity of the entire state.

Each member is appointed for a term of four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than five members' terms expire in the same year.

Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (2)(f)(I) of this section, the first appointed members shall serve initial terms of two years for four members, three years for five members, and four years for the remaining five members. This subsection (2)(f)(II) is repealed on July 1, 2028.

A member holds office for the member's term until a successor is appointed. Any member is eligible for reappointment, but members are not eligible to serve more than two consecutive full terms. Members of the board serve without compensation for such services but shall be reimbursed for their necessary expenses while serving as a member of the board. Any vacancy must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment for the unexpired term. Any member may be removed by the governor for misconduct, incompetence, neglect of duty, or other cause.

The governor shall make initial appointments of board members in accordance with subsection (2)(b) of this section on or before September 1, 2022, and shall appoint one of the members to serve as the initial chairperson. The initial chairperson has the authority to establish and administer matters related to the initial set up of the authority, including staffing, legal services, or to coordinate with the office of economic development, created in section 24-48.5-101 (1), or the department of local affairs, created in section 24-1-125 (1), on administrative matters and other matters related to the initial set up and operation of the authority, which contracts shall be for a term of no longer than one year from September 1, 2022, and shall be ratified by the board at its initial meeting set forth in subsection (4)(a) of this section. The authority may hire staff as it deems necessary or convenient to administer this part 11, and the office of economic development or the department of local affairs may assist the authority with administering this part 11. The authority may cooperate and enter into contracts with the office of economic development or the department of local affairs, or with another agency or entity, for administrative or operations matters, including for staffing. The authority shall pay the office of economic development, the department of local affairs, or another agency or entity that the authority has entered into a contract with for all costs incurred for services, staffing, and administrative costs that are approved by the initial chairperson and ratified by the board or that are approved by the authority.

Within thirty days of the governor's initial appointments pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the initial chairperson of the board as designated by the governor shall set dates for the first and second board meetings which must be held before December 31, 2022. The board may elect a new chairperson pursuant to section 29-4-1105 (1)(n) at either initial meeting. Subsequent meetings shall be set by the chairperson of the board.

All meetings of the board are open to the public. No business of the board shall be transacted except at a regular or special meeting at which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the total membership of the board is present. Any action of the board requires the affirmative vote of a majority of the members present at the meeting.

One or more members of the board may participate in any meeting and may vote through the use of telecommunications devices, including a conference telephone or similar communications equipment. Participation through telecommunications devices constitutes presence in person at the meeting. Use of telecommunications for participation does not supersede any requirements for open meetings otherwise provided by law.

All resolutions and orders of the board must be recorded and authenticated by the signature of the secretary or any assistant secretary of the board. Every legislative act of the board of a general or permanent nature must be by resolution. The book of resolutions, corporate acts, and orders is a public record. A public record must also be made of all other proceedings of the board, minutes of the meetings, annual reports, certificates, contracts, and bonds given by officers, employees, and any other agents of the authority. The account of all money received by and disbursed on behalf of the authority is a public record.

All public records of the authority are subject to the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24. All records are subject to any budget and audit laws applicable to the authority and may be subject to regular audit to the extent required by law.

Any board member, employee, or other agent or adviser of the authority who has a direct or indirect interest in any contract, transaction, or proposal with the authority or any interest, direct or indirect, in a nonprofit or for-profit organization submitting a proposal to the authority shall disclose this interest to the authority. This interest must be set forth in the minutes of the authority, and no board member, employee, or other agent or adviser having such interest shall participate on behalf of the authority in the authorization of any such contract or transaction.

No part of the revenues or assets of the authority shall inure to the benefit of, or be distributed to, its members or officers or any other private persons or entities.

The authority shall not discriminate based on race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, religion, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, marital status, familial status, military status, handicap, or physical or mental disability and will otherwise comply with fair housing laws.

Bonds, contracts, and any other obligation or liability of the authority are special limited obligations of the authority and are not bonds, contracts, obligations, or otherwise liabilities of the state. The state has no obligation or liability with respect to any bonds, contracts, or other obligation or liability of the authority.

The authority is a "public entity" as set forth in sections 24-10-103 (5) and 11-57-203 (3) and a "special purpose authority" as set forth in section 24-77-102 (15).

The authority and its corporate existence continues until terminated by law; except that no such law shall take effect so long as the authority has bonds, notes, or other obligations outstanding, unless adequate provision has been made for the payment of such obligations. Upon termination of the existence of the authority, all its rights and properties in excess of its obligations shall pass to and be vested in the state.

The income and revenue of the authority, all property at any time owned by the authority, all bonds issued by the authority, the interest on and other income from such bonds, and the transfer of such bonds are exempt from income taxation, real and personal property taxation, and all other taxation and assessments in the state. The purchase and use of property by or for the benefit of the authority are exempt from sales and use taxes imposed by the state, a county, a city and county, a city, any other political subdivision of the state, or local government entity. In the resolution or indenture authorizing bonds, the authority may waive the exemption from federal income taxation for interest on the bonds. The authority may agree to make payments in lieu of property or sales and use taxes to the state, a county, a city and county, a city, any political subdivision of the state, or local government entity.

Property sold by the authority or otherwise not owned by the authority, a controlled entity, or other governmental entity exempt from taxation shall be subject to all taxation and assessments imposed by the state, a city, a county, a city and county, any other political subdivision of the state, or a local governmental entity.

If the authority desires to voluntarily sell an affordable rental housing project, it shall notify in writing relevant public entities, including state agencies, local governments, and public housing authorities in the area in which the project is located. Notice must include a description of the property to be sold. Notified public entities have ninety days after the date of notice to submit a proposed purchase and sale agreement, and obtain binding commitment for any necessary financing or guarantees. After the ninety-day period has elapsed, the authority may broadly advertise the sale, and favor buyers that agree to maintain the project as affordable housing, provided that the financial terms of the purchase are sufficient to satisfy all of the authority's obligations with respect to the project.

A gift or contribution to or for the use of the authority for use in connection with the activities of the authority is treated as a gift to a political subdivision of the state made exclusively for public purposes.

The authority shall conduct an annual audit of its finances and shall adopt a budget and work plan for each fiscal year. The authority shall submit to the governor, the state auditor, and the general assembly within six months after the end of the state fiscal year a report that shall set forth a complete and detailed operating and financial statement of the authority during such year. The report may also include any recommendations for legislation or other action that may be necessary to carry out the purposes of the authority.

On a quarterly basis, the authority shall submit a report to the governor, to the state auditor, and to the senate committees on finance and health and human services or any successor committee, and the house of representatives committees on finance, health and insurance and public and behavioral health and human services or any successor committees. Any developer or operator of an affordable rental housing project must provide to the authority information required by this subsection (13)(b). The report shall include for each affordable rental housing project:

The number of units developed and must specify for income-restricted units at what area median income levels;

The number of units occupied;

The average area median income being served;

The actual rents charged for each unit;

Actual incomes of households residing within the units and length of occupancy;

The average market rent for a unit of the same type, size, and amenities prior to the development of an affordable rental housing project;

The average market rent for a unit of the same type, size, and amenities after one year of occupancy of at least fifty percent of the units developed in the affordable rental housing project, and for each year thereafter;

The amount of middle-income rental savings accrued to the local community from the development;

The amount of tax exemptions accrued; and

The rents charged and occupancy rates of nonincome restricted units of housing.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-232), ch. 354, p. 2518, § 2, effective June 3.

29-4-1105. General powers.

In addition to any other powers granted to the authority in this part 11, the authority has the following powers:

To have the duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities of a body corporate and political subdivision of the state;

To have perpetual existence and succession;

To adopt, have, and use a seal and to alter the same at its pleasure;

To sue and be sued;

To enter into any contract or agreement not inconsistent with this part 11 or the laws of the state;

To borrow money and to issue bonds evidencing the same;

To purchase, lease, lease with an option to purchase, trade, exchange, or otherwise acquire, maintain, hold, improve, mortgage, lease, encumber, and dispose of real property and personal property, whether tangible or intangible, and any interest therein, including easements and rights-of-way, without restriction or limitation;

To acquire office space, equipment, services, supplies, and insurance necessary to carry out the purposes of this part 11;

To deposit any money of the authority in any banking institution within or without the state or in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, and to appoint, for the purpose of making such deposits, one or more persons to act as custodians of the money of the authority, who shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board requires;

To contract for and to accept any gifts, grants, and loans of funds, property, or any other aid in any form from the federal government, the state, any state agency, or any other source, or any combination thereof, and to comply, subject to the provisions of this part 11, with the terms and conditions of such contracts or the acceptance of such items;

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers granted in this part 11, which specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this part 11;

To fix the time and place or places at which its regular and special meetings are to be held;

To adopt and from time to time amend or repeal bylaws and rules and regulations consistent with the provisions of this part 11, including rules regarding the definition and interpretation of terms used in this part 11. Nothing in this subsection (1)(m) grants the authority the power to redefine terms that are already defined in this part 11.

To elect one member as chairperson of the board and another member as chairperson pro tem of the board and to elect one or more members as secretary and treasurer of the board and elect or appoint such other offices as the board may determine and provide for their duties and terms of office;

To appoint agents, employees, and professional and business advisers, including real estate professionals, construction companies, property managers, attorneys, accountants, and financial advisers as may from time to time be necessary in its judgment to accomplish the purposes of this part 11, and to fix the compensation of such agents, employees, and advisers, and to establish the powers and duties of all agents, employees, and advisers, as well as any other person contracting with the authority to provide services, including termination of employment or the contract for services;

To make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the authority under this part 11, including but not limited to contracts with any person, firm, corporation, municipality, state agency, county, or other entity. All municipalities, counties, and state agencies may enter into and do all things necessary to perform any such arrangement or contract with the authority.

To enter into interest rate exchange agreements for bonds in accordance with article 59.3 of title 11; and

Other powers necessary to accomplish the authority's specific goals as required under this part 11.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-232), ch. 354, p. 2524, § 2, effective June 3.

29-4-1106. Additional powers - affordable workforce housing projects.

In addition to the powers specified in section 29-4-1105, the authority has the following powers:

To acquire, construct, rehabilitate, own, operate, and finance affordable rental housing projects;

To consult with a qualified nonprofit organization, county, municipality, housing authority, school district, or other relevant entity as determined by the authority to identify gaps in affordable housing capacity, disproportionately impacted communities, or other communities or localities in need of workforce housing to guide the authority in its selection of project proposals to fund;

To exercise general control and supervision of affordable rental housing projects and the land they are located on and exercise plenary power to adopt all bylaws and regulations pertaining to the acquisition, financing, development, use, and operation of affordable rental housing projects in order to advance the state interest in the provision of affordable rental workforce housing pursuant to this part 11, not in conflict with the law, as the board may deem necessary to secure the successful operation of the authority and promote the purposes of this part 11;

To make and enter into contracts or agreements with any private or public entity to facilitate a public-private partnership, including:

An agreement for the authority to acquire, construct, finance, or operate property or services in connection with an affordable rental housing project or housing assistance consistent with the provisions of this part 11; or

An agreement for a private entity to acquire, construct, finance, or operate property or services in connection with an affordable rental housing project or housing assistance consistent with the provisions of this part 11;

To contract with experienced real estate professionals with a proven track record in developing and operating projects of similar scale and complexity for the development and operation of affordable rental housing projects and to employ its own personnel or contract with public or private entities, or both, for other services necessary or convenient to the conduct of all of the authority's other activities. The authority shall hire full-time staff who are full-time employees of the authority and are responsible for compliance with public meeting laws and open records requests, affordable rental housing project proposal solicitation and review, and reporting.

To provide housing assistance to a tenant in a rental unit of an affordable rental housing project in order for the tenant to transition to home ownership on affordable terms, provided that:

Any funds used for such assistance are deemed to be excess funds from those funds needed to develop and operate an affordable rental housing project; and

The housing assistance may take the form of a grant, a subordinated loan, or an interest in the residential property purchased by the tenant; and

In order to isolate operating risk on a project-by-project basis, to establish, or adopt a resolution approving the establishment of, one or more controlled entities on a per-project basis for the duration of the affordable rental housing project unless the controlled entity must oversee more than one affordable rental housing project as demonstrated by an applicant for funding to the authority, provided that:

The controlled entity may be a nonprofit corporation, limited liability company, or other entity formed pursuant to state law and the authority shall be the sole member of the entity;

The authority shall appoint the governing body of or agent to oversee the controlled entity and may remove a member of the governing body or agent for cause;

Any revenue of the controlled entity not required to pay its expenses and obligations and to fund reserves therefor for such expenses and obligations and, upon dissolution of the controlled entity, any assets of the controlled entity not required to pay its expenses and obligations must be distributed to or at the direction of the authority and shall not be used for or accrue to the benefit of any private interests;

The authority may loan proceeds from bonds issued by the authority to the controlled entity; and

The controlled entity shall enjoy the same privileges and immunities as the authority, including but not limited to the exemptions from taxation pursuant to section 29-4-1104 (12)(a).

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-232), ch. 354, p. 2525, § 2, effective June 3.